District of Columbia statutes.
7-1201.02

Disclosures prohibited; exceptions.

(a)

Except as specifically authorized by subchapter II, III, or IV of this chapter, no mental health professional, mental health facility, data collector or employee or agent of a mental health professional, mental health facility or data collector shall disclose or permit the disclosure of mental health information to any person, including an employer.

(b)

Except as specifically authorized by subchapter II or IV of this chapter, no client in a group session shall disclose or permit the disclosure of mental health information relating to another client in the group session to any person.

(c)

No violation of subsection (a) or (b) of this section occurs until a single act or series of acts taken together amount to a disclosure of mental health information.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-136, § 102, 25 DCR 5055

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2002.
1973 Ed., § 6-1612.

Transfer of Functions

Pursuant to Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1996, the function of providing mental health services to inmates in Department of Corrections facilities provided by the Bureau of Correctional Services, Commission on Mental Health Services, were transferred to the Department of Corrections.